Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF888.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1502HV (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 888 DIVISION I 1 PRIVATE INSTRUCTION 2 Section 1. Section 299.4, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. The parent, guardian, or legal custodian of a child 5 who is of compulsory attendance age, who places the child 6 under competent private instruction under section 299A.2 , not 7 in an accredited school or a home school assistance program 8 operated by a school district or accredited nonpublic school, 9 shall furnish a report in duplicate on forms provided by the 10 public school district, to the district by September 1 of the 11 school year in which the child will be under competent private 12 instruction. The secretary shall retain and file one copy 13 and forward the other copy to the districtâs area education 14 agency. The report shall state the name and age of the child, 15 the period of time during which the child has been or will be 16 under competent private instruction for the year, an outline 17 of the course of study , or texts that will be used, and the 18 name and address of the instructor. The parent, guardian, or 19 legal custodian of a child, who is placing the child under 20 competent private instruction for the first time, shall also 21 provide the district with evidence that the child has had the 22 immunizations required under section 139A.8 , and, if the child 23 is elementary school age, a blood lead test in accordance with 24 section 135.105D . The term âoutline of course of studyâ shall 25 include subjects covered, lesson plans, and time spent on the 26 areas of study. 27 Sec. 2. Section 299A.1, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 28 2025, is amended to read as follows: 29 b. âIndependent private instructionâ means private 30 instruction that meets the following criteria: 31 (1) Is not accredited. 32 (2) Enrolls not more than four unrelated students. 33 (3) Does not charge tuition, fees, or other remuneration for 34 instruction. 35 -1- LSB 1502HV (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 7 H.F. 888 (4) (2) Provides private or religious-based instruction as 1 its primary purpose. 2 (5) (3) Provides enrolled students in all grade levels 3 with instruction in mathematics, reading , and language arts , 4 science, and social studies . 5 (4) Provides students in grades six through twelve with 6 instruction in science and social studies. 7 (6) (5) Provides, upon written request from the 8 superintendent of the school district in which the independent 9 private instruction is provided, or from the director of the 10 department of education, a report identifying the primary 11 instructor, location, name of the authority responsible for the 12 independent private instruction, and the names of the students 13 enrolled receiving the instruction, who need not be related to 14 the primary instructor . 15 (7) (6) Is not a nonpublic school and does not provide 16 competent private instruction as defined in this subsection . 17 (8) (7) Is exempt from all state statutes and 18 administrative rules applicable to a school, a school board, or 19 a school district, except as otherwise provided in chapter 299 20 and this chapter . 21 Sec. 3. Section 299A.8, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 1. If a parent, guardian, or legal custodian of a school-age 24 child who is receiving competent private instruction under this 25 chapter submits a request, the child shall also be registered 26 in a public school for dual enrollment purposes. If the child 27 is enrolled in a public school district for dual enrollment 28 purposes, the child shall be permitted to participate in any 29 academic activities in the district and shall also be permitted 30 to participate on the same basis as public school children in 31 any extracurricular activities available to children in the 32 childâs grade or group. Dual enrollment of a child solely 33 for purposes of accessing the annual achievement evaluation 34 shall not constitute a dual enrollment purpose. A child who is 35 -2- LSB 1502HV (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 7 H.F. 888 enrolled in a public school for dual enrollment purposes may 1 receive any amount of instruction by way of the public schoolâs 2 academic programs, including offerings pursuant to chapter 3 261E. 4 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 299A.13 Diplomas and credentials. 5 1. A diploma or credential issued by a person who 6 administers a program of secondary education under competent 7 private instruction or independent private instruction pursuant 8 to this chapter shall be deemed sufficient to demonstrate for 9 all purposes that the recipient has completed the program of 10 secondary education and has attained the equivalent of a high 11 school diploma. 12 2. The state, a political subdivision of the state, a 13 community college, an institution of higher education under 14 the control of the state board of regents, or an accredited 15 private institution as defined in section 256.183, shall not 16 discriminate against any individual based on the source of the 17 individualâs diploma or credential and shall treat a diploma 18 or credential awarded for completion of a program of secondary 19 education under competent private instruction or independent 20 private instruction the same as a high school diploma awarded 21 by a school district or accredited nonpublic school. 22 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 299A.14 Verification of enrollment. 23 The parent, guardian, or legal custodian of a child of 24 compulsory attendance age shall have the authority to execute 25 any document required by law to verify any of the following: 26 1. The placement of a child under competent private 27 instruction or independent private instruction. 28 2. The childâs full-time or part-time status in competent 29 private instruction or independent private instruction. 30 3. The grades the child has obtained in competent private 31 instruction or independent private instruction. 32 4. Any other required educational information. 33 Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 34 immediate importance, take effect upon enactment: 35 -3- LSB 1502HV (2) 91 jda/jh 3/ 7 H.F. 888 1. The section of this division of this Act enacting section 1 299A.13. 2 2. The section of this division of this Act enacting section 3 299A.14. 4 Sec. 7. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to any 5 diplomas or credentials issued before, on, or after the 6 effective date of this division of this Act: 7 The section of this division of this Act enacting section 8 299A.13. 9 DIVISION II 10 WORLD LANGUAGE INSTRUCTION 11 Sec. 8. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph f, Code 12 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 f. Two sequential units of one world language, which 14 may include American sign language. The world language 15 instruction shall not alter the world language to incorporate 16 gender-neutral language if the world language being offered and 17 taught utilizes a grammatical gender system. 18 Sec. 9. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 19 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 20 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (3) The educational standards 21 established in section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âfâ , 22 related to the prohibition against incorporating gender-neutral 23 language into world language instruction if the world language 24 being taught utilizes a grammatical gender system. 25 Sec. 10. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 26 by adding the following new paragraph: 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 28 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph 29 âfâ , relating to the prohibition against incorporating 30 gender-neutral language into world language instruction if 31 the world language being taught utilizes a grammatical gender 32 system in the same manner as a school district. 33